District of Columbia statutes.
31-4422

Directors — Power to make bylaws.

The directors of companies organized under this subdivision shall have power to make such bylaws as they deem proper for the management of the business affairs of such company, not inconsistent with the laws of the District and the Constitution of the United States, and prescribing the duties of officers, employees, and servants that may be employed, for the appointment or election of all officers, and for carrying on all kinds of business within the objects and purposes of such company.

History

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1150, ch. 672, ch. III, § 22

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-622.
1973 Ed., § 35-522.